Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 3 SERVICES WITH SPECIAL STATE PROVISIONS
25.5-5-313. Outpatient substance abuse treatment - report of state auditor - amendment to state plan - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1876, § 7, effective July 1.

25.5-5-314. Substance use disorder treatment for Native Americans - federal approval.

The state department shall request federal approval, conditioned on the receipt of gifts, grants, or donations sufficient to provide for the state's administrative costs of preparing and submitting the request, to include any substance use disorder treatment benefits available to Native Americans in which there is one hundred percent federal financial participation.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1876, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(2) repealed, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1269, § 30, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1328, § 203, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-422 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

25.5-5-315. Acceptance of gifts, grants, and donations - Native American substance abuse treatment cash fund.

The executive director may accept and expend money from gifts, grants, and donations for purposes of providing for the administrative costs of preparing and submitting the request for federal approval to provide substance use disorder treatment and recovery services to Native Americans as provided for in section 25.5-5-314. All such gifts, grants, and donations must be transmitted to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the Native American substance abuse treatment cash fund, which fund is created and referred to in this section as the "fund". The money in the fund is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly. All investment earnings derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund remains in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1876, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(2) repealed, (HB 14-1363), ch. 302, p. 1269, § 31, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1328, § 204, effective May 25.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1511, § 7, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-423 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

25.5-5-316. Legislative declaration - state department - disease management programs authorization - report.

The general assembly finds that, because Colorado is faced with rising health- care costs and limited resources, it is necessary to seek new ways to ensure the availability of high-quality, cost-efficient care for medicaid recipients. The general assembly further finds that disease management is a patient-focused, integrated approach to providing all components of care with attention to both quality of care and total cost. In addition, the general assembly finds that this approach may include coordination of physician care with pharmaceutical and institutional care. The general assembly further finds that disease management also addresses the various aspects of a disease state, including meeting the needs of persons who have multiple chronic illnesses. The general assembly declares that the improved coordination in disease management helps to provide chronically ill patients with access to the latest advances in treatment and teaches them how to be active participants in their health care through health education, thus reducing total health-care costs.

The state department, in consultation with the department of public health and environment, is authorized to develop and implement disease management programs, for fee-for-service and primary care physician program recipients, that are designed to address over- or under-utilization or the inappropriate use of services or prescription drugs and that may affect the total cost of health-care utilization by a particular medicaid recipient with a particular disease or combination of diseases. The disease management programs shall target medicaid recipients who are receiving prescription drugs or services in an amount that exceeds guidelines outlined by the state department. The state department shall not restrict a medicaid recipient's access to the most cost-effective and medically appropriate prescription drugs or services. The state department may contract on a contingency basis for the development or implementation of the disease management programs authorized in this subsection (2).

If the state department implements any disease management programs authorized in subsection (2) of this section, the state department shall report to the joint budget committee of the general assembly an estimate of the fiscal implications generated by the implementation of the disease management programs. Such report shall be made on or before February 1 of the year following the implementation of a disease management program and on or before each February 1 thereafter in which such program is in place.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1877, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 800, § 2, effective May 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-408.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-5-317. Obesity treatment pilot program - development and implementation - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1878, § 7, effective July 1.

25.5-5-318. Health services - provision by school districts - repeal.

As used in this section:

"School district" means any board of cooperative services established pursuant to article 5 of title 22, C.R.S., any state educational institution that serves students in kindergarten through twelfth grade including, but not limited to, the Colorado school for the deaf and the blind, created in article 80 of title 22, C.R.S., and any public school district organized under the laws of Colorado, except a local college district.

"Underinsured" means a person who has some health insurance, but whose insurance does not adequately cover the types of health services for which a school district may receive federal matching funds under this section.

Any school district may contract with the state department under this section to receive federal matching funds for amounts spent in providing health services through the public schools to students who are receiving medicaid benefits pursuant to this article and articles 4 and 6 of this title.

Repealed.

Approval of contracts under this section does not constitute a commitment by the general assembly to continue providing health services to students through the public schools using state general funds if federal matching funds are not available in the future. Any moneys provided to a school district pursuant to a contract entered into under this section shall not supplant state or local moneys provided to school districts pursuant to the provisions of articles 20 to 28 or article 54 of title 22, C.R.S.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring any school district to enter into a contract as provided in this section. Participation in a contract by a school district is voluntary.

The state department may make contracting and reimbursement of moneys under this section contingent upon either:

The contracting school district certifying to the state department, through the department of education, that it has expended local and state moneys in an amount sufficient to meet the nonfederal share of expenditures being claimed for federal financial participation; or

The contracting school district meeting the requirements of the intergovernmental transfer provisions of the federal medicaid law, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396 et seq.

Each year, by a date established by rule of the state board, the department of education shall notify the state department concerning any school district that chooses to enter into a contract as provided in this section and the anticipated level of funding for the school district. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a school district to maintain the same level of funding or services from year to year.

Each school district that chooses to enter into a contract as provided in this section shall develop a services plan with input from the local community that identifies the types of health services needed by students within the school district and the services it anticipates providing. Except for medical emergencies and services related to allegations of child abuse, a student's participation in any psychological, behavioral, social, or emotional services, including counseling or referrals, shall be optional and shall require the prior written and informed consent of a parent or legal guardian of the student.
(4) (a) (I) Each school district that chooses to enter into a contract as provided in this section shall develop a services plan with input from the local community that identifies the types of health services needed by students within the school district and the services it anticipates providing. Except for medical emergencies and services related to allegations of child abuse, a student's participation in any psychological, behavioral, social, or emotional services, including counseling or referrals, shall be optional and shall require the prior written and informed consent of a parent or legal guardian of the student.

Any health questionnaire or form related to services funded in part through this section shall only relate to the student's personal health, habits, or conduct and shall not include questions concerning the habits or conduct of any other member of the student's family.

No medical or health data or information identifying the student or the student's family shall be disclosed to any person other than a person specifically authorized to receive the information or data without the prior written and informed consent of a parent or legal guardian of the student.

Each school district that chooses to enter into a contract as provided in this section shall perform an assessment of the health-care needs of its uninsured and underinsured students and may spend an appropriate portion, not to exceed thirty percent, of the federal moneys received on health care for low-income students. For purposes of this paragraph (b), "low-income students" means students whose families are below one hundred eighty-five percent of the federal poverty line.

The school district shall submit the services plan to the department of education with a notice of participation for purposes of technical assistance evaluation and to the executive director for approval.

Each year not less than ninety days prior to the notification date established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the state department shall provide information through the department of education to school districts regarding the amount of available moneys and the administrative activities required to enter into a contract for federal matching funds for that year. To the extent allowed by existing resources, the department of education shall provide technical assistance to school districts in determining levels of funding, meeting administrative requirements, and developing services plans.

Following the notification date established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, each contracting school district, through the department of education, shall enter into a contract with the state department specifying the health services to be provided by the school district, the amount to be expended in providing the services, and the amount of federal matching funds for which the school district is eligible under the contract.

The state department is authorized to accept and expend donations, contributions, grants, including federal matching funds, and other moneys that it may receive to finance the costs associated with implementing this section.

Under the contract entered into pursuant to this section, a contracting school district shall receive from the state department all of the federal matching funds for which it is eligible under the contract, less the amount of state administrative costs allowed under paragraph (b) of this subsection (8). All moneys received by a school district pursuant to this section shall be used only to offset costs incurred for provision of student health services by the school district or to cash fund student health services in the school district.

Total allowable state administrative costs for contracts entered into under this section for both the state department and the department of education shall not exceed ten percent of the total annual amount of federal funds reflected by the general assembly for such contracts in the annual general appropriations bill. State administrative costs include costs incurred in evaluating the implementation of this section.

The state board shall specify by rule the types of health services for which a school district may receive federal matching funds under a contract created under this section, including but not limited to:

Basic primary, physical, dental, and mental health services;

Rehabilitation services;

Early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment services; and

Service coordination, outreach, enrollment, and administrative support.

A school district that provides health services under contract pursuant to this section may provide the health services directly or through contractual relationships or agreements with public or private entities, as allowed by applicable federal regulations. However, no moneys shall be expended in any form for abortions, except as provided in section 25.5-4-415 or as required by federal law.

Where possible, the school district shall coordinate the provision of health services to a student with the student's primary health-care provider. Except for those services that are required by an individualized educational program developed pursuant to section 22-20-108 (4), C.R.S., or by a section 504 plan developed pursuant to the federal "Rehabilitation Act of 1973", 29 U.S.C. sec. 701 et seq., school districts shall not claim reimbursement under this section for direct services to students enrolled in health maintenance organizations that would normally be provided to students by their health maintenance organization.

The executive director shall apply for and secure any federal waivers and state plan amendments required to implement this section.

This section shall remain in effect only for so long as federal financial participation is available for reimbursements to school districts. In the event, as specified in writing by the attorney general to the governor that federal law does not allow or is amended to disallow reimbursements to school districts or otherwise prevent the implementation of this section, this section is repealed, effective on the date of the attorney general's opinion.

The state department and the department of education shall work with the office of state planning and budgeting and the joint budget committee in implementing this section.

The state department and the department of education shall enter into an interagency agreement to provide for the implementation of this section. The state board and the state board of education are authorized to promulgate rules as may be necessary in accordance with the agreement.

The state department shall annually, or more often as necessary, hold a public hearing to receive comments from school districts, state agencies, and interested persons regarding implementation of this section.

On or before December 15, 2002, the state department shall submit a formal evaluation of the implementation of this section to the committees on education and the committees on health and human services of the house of representatives and the senate, or any successor committees.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1878, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2)(a.5) added, (SB 09-264), ch. 204, p. 928, § 6, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(4)(b) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2113, § 147, effective August 11.

25.5-5-319. Family planning pilot program - rules - federal waiver - repeal.

There is hereby established a family planning pilot program for the provision of family planning services to categorically eligible individuals who are at or below a percentage of the federal poverty line established pursuant to the federal waiver sought pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The state board shall promulgate rules setting forth the family planning services to be provided under the family planning pilot program.

The executive director of the state department, in consultation with the department of public health and environment, shall seek a federal waiver that is cost-neutral to the state general fund for the implementation of the family planning pilot program established pursuant to this section such that ten percent of the family planning services provided to low-income families pursuant to the program as described in subsection (1) of this section would be funded with state general fund moneys and ninety percent would be funded with federal matching funds. In the federal waiver, the executive director shall not seek authority to waive or disregard the provisions of 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396a (a)(23)(B).

Upon issuance of the federal waiver sought pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the departments of health care policy and financing and public health and environment shall seek the necessary appropriation of general funds through the normal budgetary process for the implementation of this act.

The executive director of the state department is authorized to accept and expend on behalf of the state any funds, grants, gifts, and donations from any private or public source for the purpose of implementing the family planning pilot program established in this section; except that no gift, grant, donation, or funds shall be accepted if the conditions attached thereto require the expenditure thereof in a manner contrary to law.

The executive director of the state department, or such executive director's designee, shall prepare a written report for the members of the general assembly concerning the findings of the department based upon the family planning pilot program. Such report shall be provided to the members of the general assembly not more than three years after commencement of the program. The report shall address the number of individuals served, the type of services provided, the cost of the program, and such other information as the executive director deems appropriate.

The implementation of this section is conditioned upon the issuance of any necessary waiver by the federal government and available appropriations pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section. The provisions of this section shall be implemented to the extent authorized by federal waiver. The pilot program established by this section shall continue for five years from the receipt of the federal waiver or for so long as specified in the federal waiver. The executive director of the state department shall provide written notice to the revisor of statutes of the final termination date of the waiver, and this section shall be repealed, effective July 1 five years after the issuance of the federal waiver or July 1 in the year in which the waiver is terminated, whichever occurs first.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1882, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 41, § 1, effective March 13.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2113, § 148, effective August 11.

25.5-5-320. Telemedicine - reimbursement - disclosure statement - rules - definition.

On or after July 1, 2006, in-person contact between a health-care or mental health-care provider and a patient is not required under the state's medical assistance program for health-care or mental health-care services delivered through telemedicine that are otherwise eligible for reimbursement under the program. The state department shall promulgate rules specifically relating to entities that deliver health-care or mental health-care services exclusively or predominately through telemedicine. Any health-care or mental health-care service delivered through telemedicine must meet the same standard of care as an in-person visit. Telemedicine may be provided through interactive audio, interactive video, or interactive data communication, including but not limited to telephone, relay calls, interactive audiovisual modalities, and live chat, as long as the technologies are compliant with the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", Pub.L. 104-191, as amended. The health-care or mental health-care services are subject to reimbursement policies developed pursuant to the medical assistance program. This section also applies to managed care organizations that contract with the state department pursuant to the statewide managed care system only to the extent that:

Health-care or mental health-care services delivered through telemedicine are covered by and reimbursed under the medicaid per diem payment program; and

Managed care contracts with managed care organizations are amended to add coverage of health-care or mental health-care services delivered through telemedicine and any appropriate per diem rate adjustments are incorporated.

The reimbursement rate for a telemedicine service shall, as a minimum, be set at the same rate as the medical assistance program rate for a comparable in-person service. The state department may consider setting the reimbursement rate on a monthly basis as well as on a daily or per-visit basis.

(2.1) For the purposes of reimbursement for services provided by home care agencies, as defined in section 25-27.5-102 (3), the services may be supervised through telemedicine or telehealth.

(2.5) (a) A telemedicine service meets the definition of a face-to-face encounter for a rural health clinic, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(2). The reimbursement rate for a telemedicine service provided by a rural health clinic must be set at a rate that is no less than the medical assistance program rate for a comparable face-to-face encounter or visit.

A telemedicine service meets the definition of a face-to-face encounter for a medical care program of the federal Indian health service. The reimbursement rate for a telemedicine service provided by a medical care program of the federal Indian health service must be set at a rate that is no less than the medical assistance program rate for a comparable face-to-face encounter or visit.

A telemedicine service meets the definition of a face-to-face encounter for a federally qualified health center, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(4). The reimbursement rate for a telemedicine service provided by a federally qualified health center must be set at a rate that is no less than the medical assistance program rate for a comparable face-to-face encounter or visit.

The state department shall establish rates for transmission cost reimbursement for telemedicine services, considering, to the extent applicable, reductions in travel costs by health-care or mental health-care providers and patients to deliver or to access such services and such other factors as the state department deems relevant.

A health-care or mental health-care provider who delivers health-care or mental health-care services through telemedicine shall provide to each patient, before treating that patient through telemedicine for the first time, the following written statements:

That the patient retains the option to refuse the delivery of the services via telemedicine at any time without affecting the patient's right to future care or treatment and without risking the loss or withdrawal of any program benefits to which the patient would otherwise be entitled;

That all applicable confidentiality protections shall apply to the services; and

That the patient shall have access to all medical information resulting from the telemedicine services as provided by applicable law for patient access to his or her medical records.

Subsection (4) of this section shall not apply in an emergency.

Repealed.

As used in this section, "health-care or mental health-care services" includes speech therapy, physical therapy, occupational therapy, dental care, hospice care, home health care, and pediatric behavioral health care.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1548, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1), (3), IP(4), and (4)(a) amended, p. 112, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2020:

IP(1) amended and (2.1), (2.5), (6), and (7) added, (SB 20-212), ch. 235, p. 1141, § 5, effective July 6.

L. 2021:

(7) amended, (SB 21-139), ch. 113, p. 443, § 2, effective May 7; IP(1) amended, (HB 21-1256), ch. 193, p. 1017, § 1, effective May 27.

25.5-5-321. Telemedicine - home health care - home health telemedicine cash fund - rules - repeal.

On or after August 11, 2010, at-home telemedicine shall be eligible for reimbursement under the state's medical assistance program. The services delivered through telemedicine shall be subject to reimbursement policies promulgated by rule of the state board after consultation with home health-care and home- and community-based services providers. This section also applies to managed care organizations that contract with the state department pursuant to the statewide managed care system, but only to the extent that:

Home health care or home- and community-based services delivered through telemedicine are covered by and reimbursed under the medicaid program; and

Managed care contracts with managed care organizations are amended to add coverage of home health care or home- and community-based services delivered through telemedicine.

The reimbursement rate for home health care or home- and community-based services delivered through telemedicine that are otherwise eligible for reimbursement under the medical assistance program shall be set by rule of the state board and shall be:

In the form of a flat fee in one or more levels, depending on acuity.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (HB 10-1005), ch. 345, p. 1598, § 1, effective August 11, 2010.)

Any cost savings identified pursuant to this section shall be considered for use in paying for home- and community-based services under part 6 of this article, community-based long-term care, and home health services.

For the first two years after August 11, 2010, gifts, grants, and donations shall be used to implement this section. Gifts, grants, and donations made for this purpose shall be transferred to the home health telemedicine cash fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the home health telemedicine cash fund shall be appropriated to the state board and used to implement this section. Moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund and not be transferred to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year. After two years or if the moneys in the cash fund are depleted, the department is authorized to go through the normal budget process to continue implementation of this section.

Reimbursement shall not be provided for purchase or lease of telemedicine equipment.

Subsection (3)(a) of this section does not apply to expenditures made pursuant to part 18 of article 6 of this title 25.5.

This subsection (3)(b) is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

That the patient shall have access to all medical information resulting from the telemedicine services as provided by applicable law for patient access to his or her medical records.

A home health-care or home- and community-based services provider who delivers services through telemedicine shall provide to each patient, before treating that patient through telemedicine for the first time, the following written statements:

(I) That the patient retains the option to refuse the delivery of home health care or home- and community-based services via telemedicine at any time without affecting the patient's right to future care or treatment and without risking the loss or withdrawal of any program benefits to which the patient would otherwise be entitled;

(II) That all applicable confidentiality protections shall apply to the services; and

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) shall not apply in an emergency.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to:

Alter the scope of practice of any home health-care or home- and community-based services provider; or

Authorize the delivery of home health care or home- and community-based services in a setting or manner not otherwise authorized by law.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1182, § 2, effective January 1, 2008.

L. 2010:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 10-1005), ch. 345, p. 1598, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-286), ch. 395, p. 2627, § 3, effective June 30.

25.5-5-321.5. Telehealth - interim therapeutic restorations - reimbursement - definitions.

Subject to federal authorization and federal financial participation, on or after July 1, 2016, in-person contact between a health-care provider and a recipient is not required under the state's medical assistance program for the diagnosis, development of a treatment plan, instruction to perform an interim therapeutic restoration procedure, or supervision of a dental hygienist performing an interim therapeutic restoration procedure. A health-care provider may provide these services through telehealth, including store-and-forward transfer, and is entitled to reimbursement for the delivery of those services via telehealth to the extent the services are otherwise eligible for reimbursement under the program when provided in person. The services are subject to the reimbursement policies developed pursuant to the state medical assistance program.

As used in this section:

"Interim therapeutic restoration" has the same meaning as set forth in section 12-220-104 (10).

"Store-and-forward transfer" means the asynchronous transmission of medical or dental information to be reviewed by a dentist at a later time at a distant site without the patient present in real time.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1309), ch. 326, p. 1334, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1709, § 182, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 21-102), ch. 31, p. 130, § 10, effective September 1.

25.5-5-322. Over-the-counter medications - rules.

Subject to approval through the state budget process in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the state board shall adopt by rule a system to allow pharmacies to be reimbursed for providing certain over-the-counter medications to recipients if prescribed by a licensed practitioner authorized to prescribe prescription drugs or, subject to the limitations contained in subsection (2) of this section, a licensed pharmacist. Over-the-counter medications subject to reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be identified through the drug utilization review process established in section 25.5-5-506, and shall be limited to medications that, if reimbursed, shall result in overall cost savings to the state.

After the list of over-the-counter medications is identified pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the state department shall request, through the state budget process, that the reimbursements be implemented. The state department shall report to the joint budget committee annually concerning the amount of any savings realized from the reimbursements.

The state board, in consultation with the state board of pharmacy created pursuant to section 12-280-104, shall establish by rule standards for when a licensed pharmacist may prescribe over-the-counter medications as provided under this section for purposes of receiving reimbursement under the medical assistance program.

When prescribing over-the-counter medications under this section, a licensed pharmacist shall consult with the recipient to determine necessity, provide drug counseling, review drug therapy for potential adverse interactions, and make referrals as needed to other health-care professionals.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-117), ch. 227, p. 985, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1628, § 75, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1709, § 183, effective October 1.